SciBin2/dics/ru_RU.dic
аккомпанировавший/CCYYSNSrsPsYSa
аккомпанировать/BbLLNnSNSrsPsY
беречь/BBLMNnSPSgSrsMsYTF
беречься/BBLMNnSgSrsYTF
блевавший/CCYYSKSNSPSQSXSbSgSkSmSrsPsYSa
блевать/BbLLNnSKSNSPSQSXSbSgSkSmSrsPsY
блефанувший/CCYYsYSa
блефануть/BbLLNNsY
блюсти/LMYYBbNnSXTB
брести/BbLMNnYYSGSKSNSPSXSkSmSrSusMsPsYTF
веривший/CCYYSFSKSNSPScSnSqSrStSvSwsPsVsYTFTWTgThTjTqSa
верить/BbLLNNYYSFSKSNSPScSnSqSrStSvSwsPsVsYTFTWTgThTjTq
влечь/BbLLNNSFSPSQSXSkSrsFsMsUTBTF
волочься/BbLLNNSKSNSPShSkSmSrsMsPTF
впасть/BBLLNNTB
гваздавшийся/CCYYSKSNSOSPSQSXShSmSrStSuSvSwSxsAsCsDsMsPsUsYTF
гваздаться/BBLLNNSKSNSOSPSQSXShSmSrStSuSvSwSxsAsCsDsMsPsUsYTF
гибнуть/BbLMNNSrsY
гипнотизировавшийся/CCYYSNSPSXSbSmSrsIsUsYTFSa
гипнотизироваться/BbLLNnSNSPSXSbSmSrsIsUsYTF
грызть/BBLLNNSKSNSPSQSXSYSgShSkSmSrSusPsUsYTF
дававшийся/CCYYSFSJSKSNSOSPSQSXSYSbShSkSmSnSoSrStSuSvSwSxSzsAsDsEsFsGsIsMsPsQsUsYTFTJTKTZTaTbTcTdTeTfTgThTiTj
даваемый/CCCDSJSKSNSPSQSYSbShSkSmSnSoSrSusMsPsUsYTWTaTbTcTdTeTfTgThTiTjSa
долбавший/CCYYSNSPSQSXSYShSkSmSrSvSwsDsPsUTFSa
долбавшийся/CCYYSNSPSQSXSYShSmSrSuSwsDsPsUTFSa
долбанный/CCXXZZSNSPSQSXSYShSkSmSrSvSwsDsPsUTFSa
долбать/BBLLNNSNSPSQSXSYShSkSmSrSvSwsDsPsUTF
долбаться/BBLLNNSNSPSQSXSYShSmSrSuSwsDsPsUTF
жевавший/CCYYSNSOSPSQSXShSkSmSrSwSxsAsPsUsY
жевавшийся/CCYYSNSPSQSXSkSmSrsAsPsUsY
жеванный/CCXXSNSOSPSQSXShSkSmSrSwSxsAsPsUsY
жёванный/CCXXSNSOSPSQSXShSkSmSrSwSxsAsPsUsY
жевать/BbLLNnSNSOSPSQSXShSkSmSrSwSxsAsPsUsY
жеваться/BbLLNnSNSPSQSXSkSmSrsAsPsUsY
зевавшийся/CCYYSNSPSXsUSa
зеваться/BBLLNNSNSPSXsU
знававший/CCYYSKSRScSnSqSrStSvsEsMsOsPsVTBTFTrTsTtTuTvSa
знававшийся/CCYYSNSPShSrSzsMsPsVTBTFTrTsTtTwSa
знаваемый/CCCDCOSKSRScSnSqSrStSvsEsMsOsPsVTBTFTrTsTtTuSa
знавать/BBLLNnSKSRScSnSqSrStSvsEsMsOsPsVTBTFTrTsTtTuTv
игрануть/BbLLNNsY
клевавший/CCYYSKSNSPSQSXSYSbSgShSkSmSrStSuSvSwsPsUsYSa
клевавшийся/CCYYSNSQSXShSmSrSxsFsPsUSa
клеванный/CCXXSKSNSPSQSXSYSbSgShSkSmSrStSuSvSwsPsUsYSa
клевать/BbLLNnSKSNSPSQSXSYSbSgShSkSmSrStSuSvSwsPsUsY
клеваться/BbLLNnSNSQSXShSmSrSxsFsPsU
колебаться/BGLLNPSGSNSPSXSkSmSrSuSwsPTF
красть/BBLLNNSKSXShSmSrsUsYTF
лазить/BbLLNnSFSKSOSPSQSXShSkSmSrStSzsAsCsDsGsMsNsPsY
макнуть/BbLLNNSNSQSbSgShSrSusPsYTF
малевавший/CCYYSKSNSOSPSQSXSYShSkSmSnSoSrStSuSvSwSxsAsCsDsFsMsPsU
малеванный/CCXXSKSNSOSPSQSXSYShSkSmSnSoSrStSuSvSwSxsAsCsDsFsMsPsU
малевать/BbLLNnSKSNSOSPSQSXSYShSkSmSnSoSrStSuSvSwSxsAsCsDsFsMsPsU
манипулировавший/CCYYSTSbSmSrSusIsPsYSa
манипулировать/BbLLNnSTSbSmSrSusIsPsY
межевавший/CCYYSKSNSPSQSXShSkSmSrsFsMsPsUsYSa
межевавшийся/CCYYSKSNSPSXShSkSmSrsFsMsPsUsYSa
межевание/IIIwSKSNShSkSmsMsU
межеванный/CCXXSKSNSPSQSXShSkSmSrsFsMsPsUsYSa
межевать/BbLLNnSKSNSPSQSXShSkSmSrsFsMsPsUsY
межеваться/BbLLNnSKSNSPSXShSkSmSrsFsMsPsUsY
межевка/IIIhIeSKSNShSkSmsMsU
межёвка/IIIhIeSKSNShSkSmsMsU
мочь/BBLMNnSJSmSrsYTOTTTU
мочься/BBLMNnSmTY
мухлевавший/CCYYSXSrsYSa
мухлевать/BbLLNnSXSrsY
низойти/BBLLNNYYsY
обольстительный/CCCDCOTASa
пасти/BBLLNNSKSNSPSXSkSrsMsPsZTF
пастись/BBLLNNSPSXSkSrSwsMsPsYTF
печатавшийся/CCYYSFSNSPSXSYSbSgSkSmSrsMsPsUTFSa
печь/BbLLNNSFSKSNSPSQSXSbSkSmSrSusMsPsUsYTF
печься/BbLLNNSKSNSPSQSXSmSrSusMsPsYTF
плававший/CCYYSNSPSQSXSbSkSmSrsPsYSa
плавать/BBLLNNSNSPSQSXSbSkSmSrsPsY
плавающий/CCTmTnSa
плевавший/CCYYSKSNSPSQSXSgSrsPsUSa
плевавшийся/CCYYSKSNSPSQSXSgSkSmSrsFsPsUTFSa
плевать/BbLLNnSKSNSPSQSXSgSrsPsU
плеваться/BbLLNnSKSNSPSQSXSgSkSmSrsFsPsUTF
подхалимничать/BBLLNNSrsY
ползти/BBLLNNSFSGSKSNSPSXSgShSkSmSrStSusMsPsZTF
прячь/BBLMNnSFSKSPSXSkSmSuSxsMsUsYTBTFTWTX
прячься/BBLMNnSFSKSPSXSkSmSuSxsMsUsYTX
публиковавший/CCYYSgSmsUSa
публикование/IIIwSgSmsU
публикованный/CCXXSgSmsUSa
публиковать/BbLLNnSgSmsU
рубавший/CCYYSFSKSNSPSQSXSYShSkSmSrStSuSvSzsAsCsDsFsGsMsPsUsY
рубанный/CCXXSFSKSNSPSQSXSYShSkSmSrStSuSvSzsAsCsDsFsGsMsPsUsY
рубать/BBLLNNSFSKSNSPSQSXSYShSkSmSrStSuSvSzsAsCsDsFsGsMsPsUsY
рубающий/CCYYSFSKSNSPSXSYShSkSmSusMsPsUsYSa
сечь/BbLLNNSKSPSQSXSYSgShSkSmSrSusIsPsUsYTF
сечься/BbLLNNSKSPSQSgShSmsIsPsU
слабнуть/BbLMNNSgsU
ставать/BBLLNnSFSJSNSPSXSbSkSmSzsEsIsJsMsOTFTNTvShTxTy
стающий/CCYySFSJSNSPSXSbSkSmSzsEsIsJsMsOTFTNTvShTxTySa
стебавшийся/CCYYSKSNSQSXSrStSuSvsMsPTFSa
стебаться/BBLLNNSKSNSQSXSrStSuSvsMsPTF
стеречь/BBLMNnSNSgSrSusKsPTFTV
стеречься/BBLMNnSgSrTFTV
стричь/BBLMNnSKSNSPSXSgShSkSmSrSusPsUTB
стричься/BBLMNnSNSgShSkSmSrSusU
сякой/CCsUSa
терявший/CCYYSPSmSrSwSzsFsOsUTFTWToSa
терявшийся/CCYYSPSmSrSwsFsUTFTWToSa
терянный/CCXXSPSmSrSwSzsFsOsUTFTWToSa
терять/BBLLNNSPSmSrSwSzsFsOsUTFTWTo
теряться/BBLLNNSPSmSrSwsFsUTFTWTo
течь/BbLLNNSFSKSNSPSQSXSgShSkSmSrSusMsPsYTFTJ
толочься/BGNPLlSPSQSmSrsUsYTF
улыбавшийся/CCYYSNSPSXSkSrsPsUSa
улыбаться/BBLLNNSNSPSXSkSrsPsU
фурычивший/CCYYSPSXSbSrsPsUToSa
фурычить/BbLLNNSPSXSbSrsPsUTo
химичивший/CCYYSNSPSXSbShSkSmSrSusMsPsYTFSa
химичить/BbLLNNSNSPSXSbShSkSmSrSusMsPsYTF
хлебавший/CCYYSKSNSPSQSkSmSrStSuSvsMsPsUsYTFSa
хлебанный/CCXXSKSNSPSQSkSmSrStSuSvsMsPsUsYTFSa
хлебать/BBLLNNSKSNSPSQSkSmSrStSuSvsMsPsUsYTF
хлебнувший/CCYYSKSPSksMsYTFSa
хлебнутый/CCCDSKSPSksMsYTFSa
хлебнуть/BbLLNNSKSPSksMsYTF
хлябавший/CCYYSNSPSXSkSrsMsPsUSa
хлябать/BBLLNNSNSPSXSkSrsMsPsU
цвести/BGLMNPSKSNSPSkStsPsU
шибавший/CCYYSFSKSNSPShSkSmStSuSvSwSzsCsEsFsGsMsPsQsUsYTFTZSa
шибаемый/CCCDSFSKSNSPShSkSmStSuSvSwSzsCsEsFsGsMsPsQsUsYTFTZSa
шибать/BBLLNNSFSKSNSPShSkSmStSuSvSwSzsCsEsFsGsMsPsQsUsYTFTZ
шикарный/CCCDCOTESa
щуренный/CCXXSPSXSbSrSuSwSxSysEsMsNTBSa
щуривший/CCYYSPSXSbSrSuSwSxSysEsMsNTBSa
щурившийся/CCYYSNSPSXSgSrSuSwSxSysEsMsNTBSa
щурить/BbLLNNYYSPSXSbSrSuSwSxSysEsMsNTB
щуриться/BbLLNNYYSNSPSXSgSrSuSwSxSysEsMsNTB
эдакий/CCCDsUSa
